Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4931.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 3a. (1) A meeting of a public body held, in whole or in
part, electronically by telephonic or video conferencing in
compliance with this section and, except as otherwise required in
this section, all of the provisions of this act applicable to a
nonelectronic meeting, is permitted by this act in the following
circumstances:
(a) Before March 31, 2021 and retroactive to March 18, 2020,
any circumstances, including, but not limited to, any of the
circumstances requiring accommodation of absent members described
CRM H02624'25 (H-1) 70ohqn


in section 3(2).
(b) Subject to subdivision (d), on and after March 31, 2021
through December 31, 2021, only those circumstances requiring
accommodation of absent members described in section 3(2). For the
purpose of permitting an electronic meeting due to a local state of
emergency or state of disaster, this subdivision applies only as
follows:
(i) To permit the electronic attendance of a member of the
public body who resides in the affected area.
(ii) To permit the electronic meeting of a public body that
usually holds its meetings in the affected area.
(c) Subject to subdivisions (d) to (g), (h), after December
31, 2021, only in the circumstances requiring accommodation of
members absent due to military duty as described in section 3(2).
(d) On and after March 31, 2021, for a public body that is an
agricultural commodity group, any circumstances, including, but not
limited to, any of the circumstances requiring accommodation of
absent members described in section 3(2). As used in this
subdivision, "agricultural commodity group" means any of the
following:
(i) A committee as that term is defined in section 2 of the
agricultural commodities marketing act, 1965 PA 232, MCL 290.652.
(ii) The state beef industry commission created in section 3 of
the beef industry commission act, 1972 PA 291, MCL 287.603.
(iii) The potato industry commission created in section 2 of
1970 PA 29, MCL 290.422.
(iv) The Michigan bean commission created in section 3 of 1965
PA 114, MCL 290.553.
(e) On and after February 13, 2024, for a public body that is
CRM H02624'25 (H-1) 70ohqn


responsible for the investment, administration, or management of a
municipal public employee retirement system, any circumstances,
including, but not limited to, any of the circumstances requiring
accommodation of absent members described in section 3(2). As used
in this subdivision, "municipal public employee retirement system"
means a retirement system as that term is defined in section 3 of
the protecting local government retirement and benefits act, 2017
PA 202, MCL 38.2803. A public body that is eligible to meet
remotely under this subdivision shall set and publish an attendance
policy that includes the determination of a quorum with 1 or more
members participating electronically.
(f) On and after February 13, 2024, for a public body that is
a joint agency formed under article 3 of the Michigan energy
employment act of 1976, 1976 PA 448, MCL 460.831 to 460.848, any
circumstances, including, but not limited to, any of the
circumstances requiring accommodation of absent members described
in section 3(2). As used in this subdivision, "joint agency"
includes a joint agency's board of commissioners and any committee
of the joint agency.
(g) On and after the effective date of the amendatory act that
added this subdivision, for a public body that is a licensing
board, any circumstances, including, but not limited to, any of the
circumstances requiring accommodation of absent members described
in section 3(2). As used in this subdivision, "licensing board"
means any body responsible for determining qualifications or
issuing credentials to serve in an occupation, including, but not
limited to, any such body established under the following acts:
(i) The public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.1101 to
333.25211.
CRM H02624'25 (H-1) 70ohqn


(ii) The occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 339.101 to
339.2677.
(iii) The skilled trades regulation act, 2016 PA 407, MCL
339.5101 to 339.6133.
(iv) The Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state construction code
act, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1501 to 125.1531.
(v) 1966 PA 1, MCL 125.1351 to 125.1356.
(vi) The mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2301
to 125.2350.
(vii) 1967 PA 227, MCL 408.801 to 408.824.
(viii) The ski area safety act of 1962, 1962 PA 199, MCL 408.321
to 408.344
(h) (g) The prerequisite circumstances to holding an
electronic meeting described in subdivision (c) do not apply to an
electronic proceeding held under section 26, 34, or 62 of the tax
tribunal act, 1973 PA 186, MCL 205.726, 205.734, and 205.762.
(2) A meeting of a public body held electronically under this
section must be conducted in a manner that permits 2-way
communication so that members of the public body can hear and be
heard by other members of the public body, and so that public
participants can hear members of the public body and can be heard
by members of the public body and other participants during a
public comment period. A public body may use technology to
facilitate typed public comments during the meeting submitted by
members of the public participating in the meeting that may be read
to or shared with members of the public body and other participants
to satisfy the requirement under this subsection that members of
the public be heard by others during the electronic meeting and the
requirement under section 3(5) that members of the public be
CRM H02624'25 (H-1) 70ohqn


permitted to address the electronic meeting.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8), a physical
place is not required for an electronic meeting held under this
section, and members of a public body and members of the public
participating electronically in a meeting held under this section
that occurs in a physical place are to be considered present and in
attendance at the meeting for all purposes.
(4) If a public body directly or indirectly maintains an
official internet presence that includes monthly or more frequent
updates of public meeting agendas or minutes, the public body
shall, in addition to any other notices that may be required under
this act, post advance notice of a meeting held electronically
under this section on a portion of the public body's website that
is fully accessible to the public. The public notice on the website
must be included on either the homepage or on a separate webpage
dedicated to public notices for nonregularly scheduled or
electronic public meetings that is accessible through a prominent
and conspicuous link on the website's homepage that clearly
describes its purpose for public notification of nonregularly
scheduled or electronic public meetings. Subject to the
requirements of this section, any scheduled meeting of a public
body may be held as an electronic meeting under this section if a
notice consistent with this section is posted at least 18 hours
before the meeting begins. Notice of a meeting of a public body
held electronically must clearly explain all of the following:
(a) Why the public body is meeting electronically.
(b) How members of the public may participate in the meeting
electronically. If a telephone number, internet address, or both
are needed to participate, that information must be provided
CRM H02624'25 (H-1) 70ohqn


specifically.
(c) How members of the public may contact members of the
public body to provide input or ask questions on any business that
will come before the public body at the meeting.
(d) How persons with disabilities may participate in the
meeting.
(5) Beginning on October 16, 2020, if an agenda exists for an
electronic meeting held under this section by a public body that
directly or indirectly maintains an official internet presence that
includes monthly or more frequent updates of public meeting agendas
or minutes, the public body shall, on a portion of the website that
is fully accessible to the public, make the agenda available to the
public at least 2 hours before the electronic meeting begins. This
publication of the agenda does not prohibit subsequent amendment of
the agenda at the meeting.
(6) A public body shall not, as a condition of participating
in an electronic meeting of the public body held under this
section, require a person to register or otherwise provide the
person's name or other information or otherwise to fulfill a
condition precedent to attendance, other than mechanisms
established and required by the public body necessary to permit the
person to participate in a public comment period of the meeting.
(7) Members of the general public otherwise participating in a
meeting of a public body held electronically under this section are
to be excluded from participation in a closed session of the public
body held electronically during that meeting if the closed session
is convened and held in compliance with the requirements of this
act applicable to a closed session.
(8) At a meeting held under this section that accommodates
CRM H02624'25 (H-1) 70ohqn


members absent due to military duty or a medical condition, only
those members absent due to military duty or a medical condition
may participate remotely. Any member who is not on military duty or
does not have a medical condition must be physically present at the
meeting to participate. This subsection does not apply to a meeting
of a public body held electronically under subsection (1)(d), (e),
or (f), or (g), or to a proceeding described in subsection
(1)(g).(1)(h).
Final Page
CRM H02624'25 (H-1) 70ohqn